Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1117
Authorized gaming operator; license; application; contents.

(1) Any applicant for an authorized gaming operator license shall include in the application to the commission the following:

(a) A market assessment that includes the feasibility and sustainability of the proposed licensed racetrack enclosure for operating games of chance in such proposed location as part of the market in Nebraska at the time of the application, including a study of the impact of such facility on both horseracing and the operation of games of chance in the state;

(b) An analysis of the anticipated impact on infrastructure, including water, electricity, natural gas, roads, and public safety, including police and fire departments;

(c) Zoning and initial planning approval from the city nearest the site of the proposed licensed racetrack enclosure;

(d) A full disclosure of the applicant's record as a racetrack and games of chance operator, including multi-jurisdictional experience;

(e) Evidence of how the proposed licensed racetrack enclosure will improve and give back in a meaningful and sustained way to the community in which the applicant is proposing to build such facility; and

(f) Any other information required by the commission.

(2) The commission may reject an application that does not meet the requirements of this section.

Laws 2022, LB876, § 18.
April 20, 2022